Louisiana, session 2026, HB16.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:2488.1(A)(2)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2488.1. City Court of Franklin; officials and employees; provisions governing
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(c) In addition to the area provided in Subparagraphs (a) and (b) of this
Paragraph, the territorial jurisdiction of the court shall extend throughout the portions
of Ward Four of St. Mary Parish that extends from the eastern most boundary of
Ward Three and is north of La. Hwy. 182 and south of Bayou Teche and continues
to the Centerville Bridge Approach Road. In such portions of Ward Four that are
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 16 ENROLLED
outside of the town of Franklin, the court shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the
justice of the peace in those cases in which the justice of the peace would have
jurisdiction.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.